Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1028.
do enact as follows:AB1028,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB1028,28Section 2. 20.566 (1) (gh) of the statutes is created to read:AB1028,2,14920.566 (1) (gh) Administration of local income tax. From the moneys 10transferred from the appropriation account under s. 20.835 (4) (gh), the amounts in 11the schedule for administering the local income tax under subch. XIV of ch. 77. 12Notwithstanding s. 20.001 (3) (a), beginning with the 2026-27 fiscal year, at the end 13of the fiscal year the unencumbered balance of this appropriation account lapses to 14the general fund.AB1028,31Section 3. 20.835 (4) (gh) of the statutes is created to read:AB1028,3,7220.835 (4) (gh) Local income tax. All moneys received from the local income 3tax imposed under subch. XIV of ch. 77, for distribution to the counties and 4municipalities that enact an ordinance imposing the tax and for interest payments 5on refunds under s. 77.9982 (5), except that 1.75 percent of the tax revenue collected 6under that subchapter shall be credited to the appropriation account under s. 720.566 (1) (gh).AB1028,48Section 4. Chapter 77 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1028,3,229CHAPTER 7710TAXATION OF FOREST 11CROPLANDS; REAL ESTATE12 TRANSFER FEES; SALES AND USE13 TAXES; COUNTY, MUNICIPALITY, 14AND SPECIAL DISTRICT SALES AND15 USE TAXES; MANAGED FOREST LAND; 16ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT SURCHARGE; 17LOCAL FOOD AND BEVERAGE TAX; 18LOCAL RENTAL CAR TAX; 19PREMIER RESORT AREA TAXES;20 STATE RENTAL VEHICLE FEE; DRY 21CLEANING FEES; ELECTRIC VEHICLE 22CHARGING TAX; LOCAL INCOME TAXAB1028,523Section 5. Subchapter XIV of chapter 77 [precedes 77.998] of the statutes is 24created to read:AB1028,4,11CHAPTER 77AB1028,4,22SUBCHAPTER XIVAB1028,4,33LOCAL INCOME TAXAB1028,4,4477.998 Imposition. In this section:AB1028,4,55(1) “Covered taxpayer” means any of the following:AB1028,4,66(a) A single individual whose Wisconsin taxable income exceeds $1,000,000.AB1028,4,87(b) A married couple, if filing jointly for purposes of the income tax imposed 8under ch. 71, whose joint Wisconsin taxable income exceeds $1,000,000.AB1028,4,109(c) A married individual, if filing separately for purposes of the income tax 10imposed under ch. 71, whose Wisconsin taxable income exceeds $500,000.AB1028,4,1111(2) “Wisconsin taxable income” has the meaning given in s. 71.01 (16).AB1028,4,161277.9981 Imposition. (1) Notwithstanding s. 66.0611 and subject to subs. (2) 13and (3), a county or municipality may impose a tax on the amount of a covered 14taxpayer’s Wisconsin taxable income that exceeds $1,000,000, or $500,000 in the 15case of a covered taxpayer described in s. 77.998 (1) (c), in the taxable year if any of 16the following conditions are met:AB1028,4,1917(a) For a covered taxpayer who is an individual described in s. 77.998 (1) (a) or 18(c), the individual resides in the county or municipality for at least 30 days during 19the taxable year.AB1028,4,2320(b) For a covered taxpayer who is an individual described in s. 77.998 (1) (a) or 21(c), the individual owns a residential property in the county or municipality for at 22least 30 days during the taxable year, regardless of the number of days the 23individual uses the residential property for personal use during the taxable year.AB1028,5,724(c) For a covered taxpayer who is an individual described in s. 77.998 (1) (a) or 1(c), the individual is physically present for employment purposes in the county or 2municipality for at least 30 days during the taxable year. If, during a taxable year, 3a covered taxpayer is physically present for employment purposes in more than one 4county, or more than one municipality, that imposes a tax under this subsection, 5only the county, or municipality, in which the person is physically present for 6employment purposes the greatest number of days during the taxable year may 7impose the tax under this subsection on the covered taxpayer.AB1028,5,98(d) For a covered taxpayer that is a married couple described in s. 77.998 (1) 9(b), either spouse meets a condition in par. (a), (b), or (c) during the taxable year.AB1028,5,1110(2) A county or municipality that imposes a tax under sub. (1) shall provide a 11credit for local income tax paid on the same income to a locality in another state.AB1028,5,1812(3) (a) A county or municipality may impose a tax under this subchapter by 13adopting an ordinance and having the ordinance approved by the electors of the 14county or municipality at a referendum held at a spring primary or election or 15partisan primary or general election and held no earlier than 70 days following 16adoption of the ordinance. The ordinance shall specify the rate at which the county 17or municipality will impose the tax on covered taxpayers and the first taxable year, 18subject to par. (b), in which the tax will be imposed.AB1028,5,2219(b) 1. A tax imposed under an ordinance approved at the spring primary or 20election may be imposed no earlier than the taxable year in which the ordinance is 21approved. A certified copy of the ordinance shall be delivered to the secretary of 22revenue no later than June 30 of the year in which the ordinance is approved.AB1028,6,3232. A tax imposed under an ordinance approved at the fall primary or election 24may be imposed no earlier than the taxable year following the taxable year in which 1the ordinance is approved. A certified copy of the ordinance shall be delivered to the 2secretary of revenue no later than December 31 of the year in which the ordinance 3is approved.AB1028,6,64(c) A repeal of an ordinance shall be effective on December 31, and a copy of 5the repeal ordinance shall be delivered to the secretary of revenue at least 120 days 6before the effective date of the repeal.AB1028,6,10777.9982 Administration. (1) The department of revenue shall levy, enforce, 8and collect the tax imposed under this subchapter and may take any action, conduct 9any proceeding, and impose interest and penalties. Any person liable for the tax 10shall submit the tax amount with a form prescribed by the department.AB1028,6,1511(2) A covered taxpayer’s taxable year for the tax imposed under this 12subchapter is the same as the covered taxpayer’s taxable year for the tax imposed 13under ch. 71, and the tax imposed under this subchapter is due on the date on 14which the covered taxpayer’s return under ch. 71 is due without regard to any 15extension.AB1028,6,1916(3) The interest and penalty provisions under ss. 71.82 (1) (a) and (b) and (2) 17(a) and (b), 71.83 (1) (a) 1., 2., and 7. and (b) 1., (2) (a) 1. to 3m. and (b) 1. to 3., and 18(3), and 71.85, as they apply to the taxes under ch. 71, apply to the tax under this 19subchapter.AB1028,6,2320(4) Sections 71.74 (1) to (3) and (9) to (15), 71.75 (1), (2), (4), (5), and (6) to (10), 2171.76, 71.77, 71.78 (1) to (8), 71.80 (1) (a) to (d), (3), (3m), (6), (8) to (12), (14), and 22(18), 71.87, 71.88, 71.89, 71.90, 71.91, and 71.93, as they apply to the taxes under 23ch. 71, apply to the tax under this subchapter.AB1028,7,1124(5) From the appropriation under s. 20.835 (4) (gh), the department of 1revenue shall distribute 98.25 percent of the tax collected under this subchapter for 2each county or municipality to that county or municipality and shall indicate to the 3county or municipality the tax reported by each covered taxpayer paying the tax in 4that county or municipality, no later than the end of the month following the end of 5the calendar quarter in which the amounts were collected. The tax distributed 6shall be increased or decreased to reflect subsequent refunds, audit adjustments, 7and all other adjustments. Interest paid on refunds of the tax under this 8subchapter shall be paid from the appropriation under s. 20.835 (4) (gh) at the rate 9under s. 77.60 (1) (a). Any county or municipality that receives a report along with 10a distribution under this subsection is subject to the duties of confidentiality to 11which the department of revenue is subject under s. 77.61 (5) and (6).AB1028,7,1212